Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3,129
Health care coverages or services; legislative intent.

The Legislature recognizes the increasing number of proposals to mandate or require the offering of health care coverages or services by insurance or otherwise, health care service contractors, and health maintenance organizations as a component of insurance policies or employee welfare benefit plans. Improved access to health care services by segments of the population which desire such services can provide beneficial social and health consequences which may be in the public interest.

The cost ramifications of expanding health care coverages and services are a growing concern. The structures of such coverages or services and the steps taken to create incentives to provide cost-effective services or to take advantage of cost-offsetting features of services can significantly influence the cost impact of mandating particular coverages and services.

Laws 1986, LB 895, § 1.